Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2701
Tobacco Enforcement Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) For purposes of this section, Master Settlement Agreement means the settlement agreement (and related documents) entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco manufacturers.

(2) The Tobacco Enforcement Fund is created. Any money received by the state from the State Enforcement Fund established as part of the Master Settlement Agreement shall be deposited into the Tobacco Enforcement Fund. The fund shall be used by the Attorney General to enforce the Master Settlement Agreement and to investigate and litigate potential violations of state tobacco laws. The Attorney General may contract with the Nebraska State Patrol and local law enforcement agencies to assist with the investigation. The contractual costs may be paid from the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 324, § 6.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.